North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 79. Firefighters on On-Call Status.

§ 106-955.
Definitions.

As used in this Article:

“Firefighter” means an employee of the North Carolina Forest Service of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services who engages in fire suppression duties or engages in emergency response duties pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.77

.

“Fire suppression duties” means involvement in on-site fire suppression, participation in Incident Management Team while it is mobilized, Operations Room duty during on-going fires or when required by high readiness plans, mop-up activities to secure fire sites, scouting and detecting forest fires, performance of standby duty, and any other activity that directly contributes to the detection, response to, and control of fires.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 160(a); 1989, c. 727, s. 218(54); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2005-386, s. 1.6; 2011-145, s. 13.25(y), (z); 2013-155, s. 14.

Transfer of Division of Forest Resources.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(a), provides: “(a) The Division of Forest Resources is transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services with all the elements of a Type I transfer, as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(yy), provides: “The transfers under this section become effective July 1, 2011, and funds transferred shall be net of any changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(zz), provides: “Any references in this act to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. Any references in this act to the Forestry Council of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Forestry Council of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.”

§ 106-956.
On-call.

On-call is time during which a firefighter is required to be available to return to the duty station or respond to an emergency within 30 minutes. The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall provide each firefighter in on-call status with an electronic communication device that makes the wearer accessible to the firefighter’s duty station.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, after 14 consecutive days that a firefighter is on duty, the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall permit the firefighter to be off duty for two days so long as the firefighter gives the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services a means of contact where the firefighter can be reached. On the days the firefighter is permitted to be off duty, the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may contact the firefighter only when there is a bona fide emergency.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 160(a); 1989, c. 727, s. 218(55); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2011-145, s. 13.25(y), (z); 2013-155, s. 14.

§§ 106-957 through 106-964.

Reserved for future codification purposes.